California, session 20252026, SB299.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 21080.68 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:21080.68. (a) This division does not apply to the following projects:(1)A project a project that consists exclusively of a day care center, as defined in Section 1596.76 of the Health and Safety Code, that is located on a parcel of land zoned exclusively for residential use.(2)A project that consists exclusively of a family daycare home, as defined in Section 1596.78 of the Health and Safety Code, that is located on a parcel of land zoned exclusively for residential use.(b) This section does not apply to a project located within 3,200 feet of a facility that actively extracts or refines oil or natural gas.(c) This section does not apply to a project located on natural and protected lands, as defined pursuant to Section 21067.5.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code.